Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1511.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART VMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSChapter81. Violent Incident Clearance and Technological Investigative MethodsCHAPTER 81VIOLENT INCIDENT CLEARANCE AND123456789101112131415161718 TECHNOLOGICAL INVESTIGATIVE METHODSSec.8101. Definitions.8102. Violent Incident Clearance and Technological Investigative Methods Program.8103. Reporting.8104. Evaluation.§ 8101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cleared by arrest." Referring to a case AN OFFENSE in which a law enforcement agency reports that the case is solved and closed for crime reporting purposes, when at least one individual has been arrested, charged with the commission of the offense and turned over to the court for prosecution, whether following arrest, court summons or police notice."Cleared by exceptional means." Referring to a case AN OFFENSE in which a law enforcement agency has: (1) identified the offender;(2) gathered enough evidence to support an arrest, make a charge and turn over the offender to the court for prosecution;(3) identified the offender's exact location so that the offender could be taken into custody immediately; and(4) encountered a circumstance outside the control of the law enforcement agency that prohibits the law enforcement agency from arresting, charging and prosecuting the offender."Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.20250HB1511PN1872 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Homicide." Either of the following:(1) Murder of the first degree as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) (relating to murder).(2) Murder of the second degree as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(b)."Law enforcement agency." A public agency of a political subdivision having general police powers and charged with investigating and making arrests in connection with violent crimes."Program." The Violent Incident Clearance and Technological Investigative Methods Program established under section 8102(a)."Violent crime." A crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses).§ 8102. Violent Incident Clearance and Technological Investigative Methods Program.(a) Establishment.--The Violent Incident Clearance and Technological Investigative Methods Program is established in the commission.(b) Purpose.--The program shall provide grants to law enforcement agencies so that law enforcement agencies have the necessary tools and resources to improve clearance rates of homicides and other violent crimes.(c) Applications.--The commission shall prescribe the form and manner in which an application may be submitted to receive a grant under the program. The commission shall accept applications on an annual basis.(d) Use of grants.--A law enforcement agency may use a grant under the program for any of the following:(1) Hiring, retaining and training personnel to 20250HB1511PN1872 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigate homicides and other violent crimes.(2) Acquiring, upgrading or replacing technology or equipment related to evidence collection, evidence processing and forensic testing related to homicides and other violent crimes.(3) Hiring, retaining and training personnel for the collection, processing and forensic testing of evidence related to homicides and other violent crimes.(4) Hiring, retaining and training of personnel to analyze homicides and other violent crimes, including the temporal and geographic trends.(5) Upgrading record management systems to achieve compliance with the reporting requirements specified in this chapter.(6) Supporting witnesses to help in the investigations of homicides and other violent crimes.(7) Ensuring compliance with the reporting requirements of this chapter.(e) Supplemental nature of grants.--Grants allocated through the program shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funding for law enforcement agencies.(f) Subsequent applications.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a law enforcement agency from making an application to receive a grant under the program in a subsequent year for the same purpose and amount as in the prior year.(g) Geographic diversity.--(1) The commission shall ensure that grants awarded under the program are geographically dispersed throughout this Commonwealth.(2) The commission shall reserve not less than 10% of 20250HB1511PN1872 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available grants under the program for law enforcement agencies serving rural communities.(h) Multijurisdictional applications.--Two or more otherwise eligible law enforcement agencies representing different jurisdictions within this Commonwealth may submit a joint application for a grant under this program.§ 8103. Reporting.Each grant recipient under the program shall submit a report to the commission annually in the form and manner determined by the commission. At a minimum, each report shall contain the following:(1) The fraction of cases in each offense type that were cleared by arrest and cleared by exceptional means.(2) For each case included in paragraph (1), the year that the offense was committed and the year that the offense was cleared.(1) THE NUMBER OF CRIMINAL INCIDENTS INVOLVING ONE OR MORE HOMICIDES OR VIOLENT OFFENSES AS FOLLOWS:(I) THE NUMBER OF HOMICIDES OR VIOLENT OFFENSES PER CRIMINAL INCIDENT.(II) THE NUMBER OF OFFENSES INVOLVED IN EACH CRIMINAL INCIDENT THAT WERE CLEARED BY ARREST.(III) THE NUMBER OF OFFENSES INVOLVED IN EACH CRIMINAL INCIDENT THAT WERE CLEARED BY EXCEPTIONAL MEANS.(2) FOR EACH OFFENSE IN PARAGRAPH (1), THE DATE THE OFFENSE WAS COMMITTED AND THE DATE THE OFFENSE WAS CLEARED.(3) The number of personnel, including sworn law enforcement officers and nonsworn civilian staff, hired or assigned to investigate homicides and other violent crimes.(4) The number of personnel hired or assigned to 20250HB1511PN1872 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collect, process and test forensic evidence.(5) The description of any training developed or implemented.(6) The description of any technology or record management systems purchased, acquired or upgraded.(7) The percentage of the grant award utilized for each eligible use specified in this chapter.§ 8104. Evaluation.(a) Purpose.--The commission shall evaluate the program to help identify:(1) whether the objectives of the program have been met; and(2) the program's impact, strengths and areas of potential improvement.(b) Contents.--Each evaluation of the program shall include the following:(1) Performance metrics, which must include:(i) The fraction of cases in each offense OFFENSES IN EACH category that were cleared by arrest and cleared by exceptional means.(ii) The average duration between the date of the offense and the date of the clearance for each offense category included in the reporting under this chapter.(iii) The percentage of the award utilized for each eligible use.(2) Program assessment, which must include an analysis of:(i) Practices implemented by grant recipients under the program that the commission deems to be successful in improving clearance rates.20250HB1511PN1872 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Areas for improvement that would enhance the impact of the program specifically and increase clearance rates generally.(c) Submittal.--No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection and by December MARCH 31 of each year thereafter, the commission shall submit an evaluation in accordance with this section to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Limitation on administrative expenses.--The commission may not expend more than 3% of money appropriated to the commission for the program on administrative expenses.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1511PN1872 - 7 - <--12345678910111213141516171819